Nevada, session 83, SB274.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. NRS 232B.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232B.210 1. The Sunset Subcommittee of the Legislative
Commission, consisting of nine members, is hereby created. The
membership of the Sunset Subcommittee consists of:
(a) Three voting members of the Legislature appointed by the
Majority Leader of the Senate, at least one of whom must be a
member of the minority political party;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) Three voting members of the Legislature appointed by the
Speaker of the Assembly, at least one of whom must be a member
of the minority political party; and
(c) Three nonvoting members of the general public appointed by
the Chair of the Legislative Commission from among the names of
nominees submitted by the Governor pursuant to subsection 2.
2. The Governor shall, at least 30 days before the beginning of
the term of any member appointed pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 1, or within 30 days after such a position on the Sunset
Subcommittee becomes vacant, submit to the Legislative
Commission the names of at least three persons qualified for
membership on the Sunset Subcommittee. The Chair of the
Legislative Commission shall appoint a new member or fill the
vacancy from the list, or request a new list. The Chair of
the Legislative Commission may appoint any qualified person who
is a resident of this State to a position described in paragraph (c) of
subsection 1.
3. Each member of the Sunset Subcommittee serves at the
pleasure of the appointing authority.
4. The [voting members of the Sunset Subcommittee] Chair of
the Legislative Commission shall [elect a] appoint the Chair of the
Sunset Subcommittee from one House of the Legislature and [a]
Vice Chair from the other House. Each Chair and Vice Chair of the
Sunset Subcommittee holds office for a term of 2 years
commencing on July 1 of each odd-numbered year. If a vacancy
occurs in the office of Chair or Vice Chair, the vacancy must be
filled in the same manner as the original selection for the remainder
of the unexpired term.
5. The membership of any member of the Sunset
Subcommittee who is a Legislator and who is not a candidate for
reelection or who is defeated for reelection terminates on the day
next after the general election.
6. A vacancy on the Sunset Subcommittee must be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment.
7. The Sunset Subcommittee shall meet at the times and places
specified by a call of the Chair. Four voting members of the Sunset
Subcommittee constitute a quorum, and a quorum may exercise any
power or authority conferred on the Sunset Subcommittee.
8. For each day or portion of a day during which a member of
the Sunset Subcommittee who is a Legislator attends a meeting of
the Sunset Subcommittee or is otherwise engaged in the business
of the Sunset Subcommittee, except during a regular or special
session of the Legislature, the Legislator is entitled to receive the:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) Compensation provided for a majority of the members of the
Legislature during the first 60 days of the preceding regular session;
(b) Per diem allowance provided for state officers generally; and
(c) Travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
 The compensation, per diem allowances and travel expenses of
the members of the Sunset Subcommittee who are Legislators must
be paid from the Legislative Fund.
9. While engaged in the business of the Sunset Subcommittee,
the members of the Subcommittee who are not Legislators are
entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 3. NRS 622.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
622.100 1. Each regulatory body shall, on or before the 20th
day of January, April, July and October, submit to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau in an electronic format prescribed
by the Director:
(a) A summary of each disciplinary action taken by the
regulatory body during the immediately preceding calendar quarter
against any licensee of the regulatory body; and
(b) A report that includes:
(1) For the immediately preceding calendar quarter:
(I) The number of licenses issued by the regulatory body;
(II) The total number of applications for licensure
received by the regulatory body;
(III) The number of applications rejected by the
regulatory body as incomplete;
(IV) The average number of days between the date of
rejection of an application as incomplete and the resubmission by
the applicant of a complete application;
(V) A list of each reason given by the regulatory body for
the denial of an application and the number of applications denied
by the regulatory body for each such reason; and
(VI) The number of applications reviewed on an
individual basis by the regulatory body or the executive head of the
regulatory body;
[(VII) The number of petitions submitted to the regulatory
body pursuant to NRS 622.085;
(VIII) The number of determinations of disqualification
made by the regulatory body pursuant to NRS 622.085; and
(IX) The reasons for such determinations;] and
(2) Any other information that is requested by the Director or
which the regulatory body determines would be helpful to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Legislature in evaluating whether the continued existence of the
regulatory body is necessary.
2. The Director shall:
(a) Provide any information received pursuant to subsection 1 to
a member of the public upon request;
(b) Cause a notice of the availability of such information to be
posted on the public website of the Nevada Legislature on the
Internet; and
(c) Transmit a compilation of the information received pursuant
to subsection 1 to the Legislative Commission quarterly, unless
otherwise directed by the Commission.
3. The Director, on or before the first day of each regular
session of the Legislature and at such other times as directed, shall
compile the reports received pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection
1 and distribute copies of the compilation to the Senate Standing
Committee on Commerce and Labor and the Assembly Standing
Committee on Commerce and Labor, each of which shall review the
compilation to determine whether the continued existence of each
regulatory body is necessary.
Sec. 4. NRS 232B.237 is hereby repealed.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)